Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0977.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3406nn. (1) The department shall apply to the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services under section 1332 of the patient protection and affordable care act, 42 USC 18052, for a state innovation waiver to do any of the following: (a) Waive any applicable provisions of the patient protection and affordable care act with respect to health insurance coverage. (b) Establish a reinsurance program in accordance with an approved waiver. (c) Maximize federal funding for the reinsurance program for plan years beginning on or after implementation of the program. (2) On or before 180 days after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, the department shall do all of the following: (a) Make a draft application available for a 30-day public review and comment period. The department shall consider any comments in its final submitted application. (b) Provide the draft application to the standing committees of the senate and the house of representatives that primarily consider health and insurance matters. (c) Hold a public hearing regarding the draft application. (3) The department may amend the waiver application at any time as necessary to carry out the provisions of the Michigan health insurance exchange act. (4) On approval of the department's application for an innovation waiver by the United States Department of Health and Human Services, the department shall implement a reinsurance program. (5) The department shall report to the appropriation committees of the senate and house of representatives on money necessary to fund the reinsurance program under this section and suggested sources of the money, including any money necessary to be appropriated by the legislature from the general fund. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 973 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.